Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.360

Clarke-McNary fund.

The department and Washington State University may each receive funds from the federal government in connection with cooperative work with the United States department of agriculture, authorized by sections 4 and 5 of the Clarke-McNary act of congress, approved June 7, 1924, providing for the procurement, protection, and distribution of forestry seed and plants for the purpose of establishing windbreaks, shelter belts, and farm wood lots and to assist the owners of farms in establishing, improving, and renewing wood lots, shelter belts, and windbreaks; and are authorized to disburse such funds as needed. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Clarke-McNary fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the Clarke-McNary fund.

[ 2002 c 371 s 908; 1986 c 100 s 46.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 371: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.